California, session 20252026, AB2423.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6051 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:6051. (a) Cotton pests abatement districts may be organized and established by the board boards of supervisors of the Counties of Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and may exercise the powers expressly granted, or necessarily implied, by those provisions.The (b) A cotton pests abatement district may include land in more than one of the counties listed in this section with the consent of the board boards of supervisors of the counties affected. The county which that includes the majority of acreage in the district shall be designated the principal county. The agricultural commissioner and county officers in the principal county shall perform the acts required by the provisions of this chapter. District funds shall be deposited in into the treasury of the principal county.Chapter(c) The Teeter Plan Bond Law of 1994 (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code Code) and the District Reorganization Act of 1965 do not apply to cotton pests abatement districts organized pursuant to this chapter.SECTION 1.Section 50332 of the Government Code is amended to read:50332.By a four-fifths vote of its legislative body, a local agency may donate and convey, for fairground or exposition, park, playground, or recreational purposes, to the state or to the district agricultural association of the agricultural district in which the local agency is situated any land and buildings owned, held, or used by the local agency, upon those terms as the local agency and the district agricultural association or the state agree. If the local agency received the land or buildings by donation or dedication, the agreement is subject to the covenants, conditions, and restrictions of the donation or dedication as to the use of the land and buildings, existing at the date of transfer from the local agency.